Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB322.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 308.1 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 308.1. Consumer protection and information.* * *(c) Public comments.--Any notice of a proposed rate change or system acquisition required to be sent to utility customers by the public utility or applicant shall include instructions on how to submit comments on the proposed rate change or system acquisition to the commission by mail and electronically. The commission shall, at a minimum, accept comments by mail and electronically, either through email or submission through a publicly accessible Internet website.1234567891011121314151617 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0322PN0278 - 2 - 1